Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2901.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 462A.40, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Use of funds; grant and loan program. (a) The agency may award grants and loans to be used for multifamily and single family developments for persons and families of low and moderate income. Allowable use of the funds include: gap financing, as defined in section 462A.33, subdivision 1; new construction; acquisition; rehabilitation; demolition or removal of existing structures; construction financing; permanent financing; interest rate reduction; new text begin services enumerated in section 462A.37, subdivision 1, paragraph (k), in existing supportive housing as defined in that paragraph; new text end and refinancing. (b) The agency may give preference for grants and loans to comparable proposals that include regulatory changes or waivers that result in identifiable cost avoidance or cost reductions, including but not limited to increased density, flexibility in site development standards, or zoning code requirements.